Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5705
Base year, defined.

Except for a tier 5 project that is sequential to a tier 2 large data center project, base year means the year immediately preceding the year of application. For a tier 5 project that is sequential to a tier 2 large data center project, the base year means the last year of the tier 2 large data center project entitlement period relating to sales tax exemptions.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 27;

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB1150, § 7.